Washington statutes.
RCW 41.04.540

Disability leave supplement for law enforcement officers and firefighters—Supplement not required in smaller cities, towns, and counties.

Cities and towns with a population of less than twenty-five hundred and counties with a population of less than ten thousand shall not be required to provide a disability leave supplement to their commissioned law enforcement officers and full-time paid firefighters who qualify for payments pursuant to RCW 51.32.090, due to temporary total disability.

[ 1985 c 462 s 12.]

NOTES:

Program and fiscal review—1985 c 462: See note following RCW 41.04.500.